Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 6. General Provisions.

Sec. 42.08.510.
Designation of service agents.

An in-state natural gas pipeline carrier shall file with the commission a written appointment of a named permanent resident, which may be a corporation, of this state as its registered agent in this state on whom service of all notices, regulations, and requests of the commission may be made. The appointment shall specify the address in this state of the appointed agent. The address may be changed from time to time by filing a new address in the state with the commission. If an in-state natural gas pipeline carrier fails to appoint a registered agent, service of notices, regulations, and requests may be made by posting a copy in the main office of the commission and filing a copy in the office of the lieutenant governor.

History.

(§ 21 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 42.08.520.
Effect of regulations.

Regulations adopted by the commission under this chapter have the effect of law.

History.

(§ 21 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 42.08.530.
Judicial review and enforcement.

Except as provided in AS

38.35.200(c)

, a final order of the commission under this chapter is subject to judicial review under AS

44.62.560

and

44.62.570

.

If an appeal is not taken from a final order of the commission within 10 calendar days after an investigation under AS

42.08.220(b)(3)

, the commission may apply to the superior court for enforcement of the order of the commission. The court shall enforce the order by injunction or other process.

History.

(§ 21 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 42.08.540.
Joinder of actions.

Under the applicable court rules, appeals from orders of the commission and applications for enforcement of orders of the commission may be joined. The court may, in the interests of justice, separate the actions.

History.

(§ 21 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 42.08.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“affiliated” or “affiliated interest,” with respect to an in-state natural gas pipeline carrier, means any person that

is controlled or owned, in whole or in part, by the in-state natural gas pipeline carrier;

is controlled or owned, in whole or in part, by an entity that controls or owns, in whole or in part, the in-state natural gas pipeline carrier; or

controls or owns, in whole or in part, the in-state natural gas pipeline carrier;

“commission” means the Regulatory Commission of Alaska created under AS

42.04.010

;

“commissioner” means a member of the commission;

“firm transportation service” means service by a natural gas pipeline carrier that is not subject to a prior claim by another shipper or another class of service; service constitutes “firm transportation service” if the service receives the same priority as any other class of firm transportation service;

“in-state natural gas pipeline” or “in-state natural gas pipeline facility” means a natural gas pipeline that transports or will transport natural gas in the state by way of contract carriage;

“in-state natural gas pipeline carrier” means the owner, including a corporation, company, or other entity organized under the laws of the United States or of any state, of an in-state natural gas pipeline or an interest in it, or a person, including a corporation, company, or other entity organized under the laws of the United States or of any state, that transports or will transport natural gas as a contract carrier;

“natural gas pipeline” has the meaning given in AS

31.25.390

;

“precedent agreement” means a contractual commitment, including a presubscription agreement, to acquire firm transportation capacity, executed between an in-state natural gas pipeline carrier and another person, that establishes the rates, terms, and conditions for service;

“record” means a report, file, book, account, paper, or application and the facts and information contained in it.

History.

(§ 21 ch 11 SLA 2013)